Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201077-1716
Collection of taxes; notice to taxpayer.

The county
treasurer shall, at any time prior to
January 1 of each year, send a notice to each person on the personal tax roll
and each person owing real estate taxes on mobile homes, cabin trailers, manufactured
homes, or similar property assessed and taxed as improvements to leased land,
advising such taxpayer of the amount of such taxes owed for that year.

Laws 1903, c. 73, § 154, p. 443;

R.S.1913, § 6483;

C.S.1922, § 6010;

C.S.1929, § 77-1915;

Laws 1933, c. 136, § 3, p. 518;

Laws 1937, c. 167, § 22, p. 654;

Laws 1939, c. 98, § 22, p. 441;

Laws 1941, c. 157, § 22, p. 625;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 77-1915;

Laws 1943, c. 181, § 1, p. 627;

R.S.1943, § 77-1716;

Laws 1995, LB 452, § 31;

Laws 1995, LB 490, § 165;

Laws 1998, LB 306, § 30;

Laws 2000, LB 968, § 64;

Laws 2010, LB873, § 1.
July 15, 2010